Nevada, session 83, SB10.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 321.5954 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
321.5954 1. In carrying out a program authorized pursuant to
NRS 321.5953, the Division may, as the State Land Registrar deems
appropriate regarding particular parcels of land:
(a) Acquire, from a willing owner, real property or an interest in
real property in the Lake Tahoe Basin by donation, purchase or
exchange;
(b) Transfer real property or an interest in real property in the
Lake Tahoe Basin by sale, lease or exchange;
(c) Eliminate, or mitigate the effects of, development, land
coverage or features or conditions of real property acquired pursuant
to paragraph (a) that are detrimental to the natural environment of
the Lake Tahoe Basin; and
(d) Retire, extinguish or otherwise terminate rights to develop
or place land coverage on real property acquired pursuant to
paragraph (a).
2. The State Land Registrar may transfer real property or an
interest in real property acquired pursuant to this section:
(a) To state and federal agencies, local governments and
nonprofit organizations for such consideration as the State Land
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Registrar deems to be reasonable and in the interest of the general
public.
(b) To other persons for a price that is not less than the fair
market value of the real property or interest.
3. Before real property or an interest in real property is
transferred pursuant to this section, the State Land Registrar shall
record a declaration of restrictions or deed restrictions if the State
Land Registrar determines that such restrictions are necessary to
protect the public interest.
4. The State Land Registrar shall report [quarterly] annually to
the State Board of Examiners regarding the real property or interests
in real property transferred pursuant to this section.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person shall
not acquire, disturb or use real property or an interest in real
property acquired by this State pursuant to this section unless the
person first obtains written authorization from the State Land
Registrar.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Interest in real property” includes, without limitation:
(1) An easement for conservation as that term is defined in
NRS 111.410;
(2) The right to develop the real property;
(3) The right to place land coverage on the real property; and
(4) Such other easements or rights as are appurtenant to the
real property.
(b) “Land coverage” means a covering over or compaction of
the natural surface of the ground that prevents water from
percolating into the ground.
Sec. 2. NRS 528.150 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)